Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2155
Satisfaction or payment; certificate; recording and indexing; duties of register of deeds.

It shall be the duty of the register of deeds on receipt of the certificate mentioned in section 25-2154 to enter the same upon his numerical index, and record the same in the mortgage record of his office.

Laws 1887, c. 63, § 2, p. 564;

R.S.1913, § 5615;

C.S.1922, § 4934;

C.S.1929, § 26-1011;

R.S.1943, § 25-2155.